Utah statutes.
78B-13-311.   Writ to take physical custody of child.
(1)  Upon the filing of a petition seeking enforcement of a child custody
determination, the petitioner may file a verified application for the issuance
of a writ of assistance to take physical custody of the child if the child is
likely to suffer serious imminent physical harm or removal from this state.
(2)  If the court, upon the testimony of the petitioner or other witness,
finds that the child is likely to suffer serious imminent physical harm or be
imminently removed from this state, it may issue a writ of assistance to take
physical custody of the child.  The petition shall be heard within 72 hours
after the writ is executed.  The writ shall include the statements required by
Subsection 78B-13-308(2).
(3)  A writ to take physical custody of a child shall:
(a)  recite the facts upon which a conclusion of serious imminent physical
harm or removal from the jurisdiction is based;
(b)  direct law enforcement officers to take physical custody of the child
immediately; and
(c)  provide for the placement of the child pending final relief.
(4)  The respondent shall be served with the petition, writ, and order
immediately after the child is taken into physical custody.
(5)  A writ of assistance to take physical custody of a child is enforceable
throughout this state.  If the court finds on the basis of the testimony of
the petitioner or other witness that a less intrusive remedy is not effective,
it may authorize law enforcement officers to enter private property to take
physical custody of the child.  If required by the exigency of the case, the
court may authorize law enforcement officers to make a forcible entry at any
hour.
(6)  The court may impose conditions upon placement of a child to ensure the
appearance of the child and the child's custodian.
